Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB328.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 95.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each member of the police force, including special police officers[policemen],
before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take an oath to
faithfully discharge the duties of his or her office.
(2) This oath shall be subscribed by the person taking it and filed in the office of the
department of public safety.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 9:16 AM Jacketed